test/src/morphology/V-merkita_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - merkitä: # Verb 'to mean, / merkitä' - full paradigm
     merkitä+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: merkičen
     merkitä+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: merkičet
     merkitä+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: merkiččöy
     merkitä+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: merkičemmö
     merkitä+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: merkičettö
     merkitä+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: merkitäh
     merkitä+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: merkiče

     merkitä+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: merkičin
     merkitä+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2: merkičit
     merkitä+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: merkičči
     merkitä+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1: merkičimmö
     merkitä+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2: merkičittö
     merkitä+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3: merkittih
     merkitä+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: merkinnyh
     merkitä+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+ScPl3: merkitty

     merkitä+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg1:  merkiččizin
     merkitä+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg2:  merkiččizit
     merkitä+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg3:  merkiččis
     merkitä+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl1:  merkiččizimmö
     merkitä+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl2:  merkiččizittö
     merkitä+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl3:  merkittäs
     merkitä+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: merkiččis
     merkitä+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg+ScPl3:  merkittäs

     merkitä+V+Cond+Prt+ScSg1:  merkinnyzin
     merkitä+V+Cond+Prt+ScSg2:  merkinnyzit
     merkitä+V+Cond+Prt+ScSg3:  merkinnys
     merkitä+V+Cond+Prt+ScPl1:  merkinnyzimmö
     merkitä+V+Cond+Prt+ScPl2:  merkinnyzittö
     merkitä+V+Cond+Prt+ScPl3:  merkitännys
     merkitä+V+Cond+Prt+ConNeg: merkinnys
     merkitä+V+Cond+Prt+ConNeg+ScPl3:  merkitännys

     merkitä+V+Pot+ScSg1:  merkinnen
     merkitä+V+Pot+ScSg2:  merkinnet
     merkitä+V+Pot+ScSg3:  merkinnöy
     merkitä+V+Pot+ScPl1:  merkinnemmö
     merkitä+V+Pot+ScPl2:  merkinnettö
     merkitä+V+Pot+ScPl3:  merkitänneh
     merkitä+V+Pot+ConNeg: merkinne
     merkitä+V+Pot+ConNeg+ScPl3:  merkitänne

     merkitä+V+Imprt+ScSg2:  merkiče
     merkitä+V+Imprt+ScSg3:  merkikkäh
     merkitä+V+Imprt+ScPl1:  merkikkiämmö
     merkitä+V+Imprt+ScPl2: [merkikkiä, merkikkiättö]
     merkitä+V+Imprt+ScPl3:  merkittähes
     merkitä+V+Imprt+ConNeg+ScSg2: merkiče
     merkitä+V+Imprt+ConNeg+ScSg3: merkikkäh
     merkitä+V+Imprt+ConNeg+ScPl1: merkikkiämmö
     merkitä+V+Imprt+ConNeg+ScPl2: merkikkiä
     merkitä+V+Imprt+ConNeg+ScPl3: merkittähes


     merkitä+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Nom: merkiččii
     merkitä+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Gen: merkiččijän
     merkitä+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Acc: [merkiččii, merkiččijän]
     merkitä+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Par: merkiččijiä
     merkitä+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Ess: merkiččijänny
     merkitä+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Tra: merkiččijäkse
     merkitä+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Ine: merkiččijäs
     merkitä+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Ela: [merkiččijäspäi, merkiččijäs]
     merkitä+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Ill: merkiččijäh
     merkitä+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Ade: merkiččijäl
     merkitä+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Abl: [merkiččijälpäi, merkiččijäl]
     merkitä+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+All: merkiččijäle
     merkitä+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Abe: merkiččijättäh
     merkitä+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Com: merkiččijänke
     merkitä+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Prl: merkiččijäči
     merkitä+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Nom: merkiččijät
     merkitä+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Gen: merkiččijöin
     merkitä+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Acc: merkiččijät
     merkitä+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Par: merkiččijöi
     merkitä+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Ess: merkiččijöinny
     merkitä+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Tra: merkiččijöikse
     merkitä+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Ine: merkiččijöis
     merkitä+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Ela: [merkiččijöispäi, merkiččijöis]
     merkitä+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Ill: merkiččijöih
     merkitä+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Ade: merkiččijöil
     merkitä+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Abl: [merkiččijöilpäi, merkiččijöil]
     merkitä+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+All: merkiččijöile
     merkitä+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Abe: merkiččijöittäh
     merkitä+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Com: merkiččijöinke
     merkitä+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Prl: merkiččijöiči
     merkitä+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Ins: merkiččijöin


     merkitä+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Nom: merkittävy
     merkitä+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Gen: merkittävän
     merkitä+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Acc: [merkittävy, merkittävän]
     merkitä+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Par: merkittäviä
     merkitä+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Ess: merkittävänny
     merkitä+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Tra: merkittäväkse
     merkitä+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Ine: merkittäväs
     merkitä+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Ela: [merkittäväspäi, merkittäväs]
     merkitä+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Ill: merkittäväh
     merkitä+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Ade: merkittäväl
     merkitä+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Abl: [merkittävälpäi, merkittäväl]
     merkitä+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+All: merkittäväle
     merkitä+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Abe: merkittävättäh
     merkitä+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Com: merkittävänke
     merkitä+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Prl: merkittäväči

     merkitä+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Nom: merkittävät
     merkitä+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Gen: merkittävien
     merkitä+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Acc: merkittävät
     merkitä+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Par: merkittävii
     merkitä+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Ess: merkittävinny
     merkitä+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Tra: merkittävikse
     merkitä+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Ine: merkittävis
     merkitä+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Ela: [merkittävispäi, merkittävis]
     merkitä+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Ill: merkittävih
     merkitä+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Ade: merkittävil
     merkitä+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Abl: [merkittävilpäi, merkittävil]
     merkitä+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+All: merkittävile
     merkitä+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Abe: merkittävittäh
     merkitä+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Com: merkittävienke
     merkitä+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Prl: merkittäviči
     merkitä+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Ins: merkittävin

     merkitä+V+ActPrfPrc+Sg+Nom: merkinnyh
     merkitä+V+ActPrfPrc+Sg+Gen: merkinnyön
     merkitä+V+ActPrfPrc+Sg+Acc: [merkinnyh, merkinnyön]
     merkitä+V+ActPrfPrc+Sg+Par: merkinnytty
     merkitä+V+ActPrfPrc+Sg+Ess: merkinnyönny
     merkitä+V+ActPrfPrc+Sg+Tra: merkinnyökse
     merkitä+V+ActPrfPrc+Sg+Ine: merkinnyös
     merkitä+V+ActPrfPrc+Sg+Ela: [merkinnyöspäi, merkinnyös]
     merkitä+V+ActPrfPrc+Sg+Ill: merkinnyöh
     merkitä+V+ActPrfPrc+Sg+Ade: merkinnyöl
     merkitä+V+ActPrfPrc+Sg+Abl: [merkinnyölpäi, merkinnyöl]
     merkitä+V+ActPrfPrc+Sg+All: merkinnyöle
     merkitä+V+ActPrfPrc+Sg+Abe: merkinnyöttäh
     merkitä+V+ActPrfPrc+Sg+Com: merkinnyönke
     merkitä+V+ActPrfPrc+Sg+Prl: merkinnyöči

     merkitä+V+ActPrfPrc+Pl+Nom: merkinnyöt
     merkitä+V+ActPrfPrc+Pl+Gen: merkinnyzien
     merkitä+V+ActPrfPrc+Pl+Acc: merkinnyöt
     merkitä+V+ActPrfPrc+Pl+Par: merkinnyzii
     merkitä+V+ActPrfPrc+Pl+Ess: merkinnyzinny
     merkitä+V+ActPrfPrc+Pl+Tra: merkinnyzikse
     merkitä+V+ActPrfPrc+Pl+Ine: merkinnyzis
     merkitä+V+ActPrfPrc+Pl+Ela: [merkinnyzispäi, merkinnyzis]
     merkitä+V+ActPrfPrc+Pl+Ill: merkinnyzih
     merkitä+V+ActPrfPrc+Pl+Ade: merkinnyzil
     merkitä+V+ActPrfPrc+Pl+Abl: [merkinnyzilpäi, merkinnyzil]
     merkitä+V+ActPrfPrc+Pl+All: merkinnyzile
     merkitä+V+ActPrfPrc+Pl+Abe: merkinnyzittäh
     merkitä+V+ActPrfPrc+Pl+Com: merkinnyzienke
     merkitä+V+ActPrfPrc+Pl+Prl: merkinnyziči
